Utah statutes.
23-19-17.   Resident fishing and hunting license -- Use of fee.

(1)  A resident, after paying the fee established by the Wildlife Board, may obtain, as provided by the Wildlife Board's rules, a combination license to:

(a)  fish;

(b)  hunt for small game; and

(c)  apply for or obtain a big game, cougar, bear, or turkey hunting permit.

(2)  Up to $1 of the combination license fee may be used for the hunter education program for any of the following:

(a)  instructor and student training;

(b)  assisting local organizations with development;

(c)  maintenance of existing facilities; or

(d)  operation and maintenance of the hunter education program.

(3) (a)  Up to 50 cents of the combination license fee may be used for the upland game program to:

(i)  acquire pen-raised birds; or

(ii)  capture and transplant upland game species.

(b)  The combination license fee revenue designated for the upland game program by Subsection (3)(a) is in addition to any combination license fee revenue that may be used for the upland game program as provided by Sections 23-19-43 and 23-19-47.

